Hawaii, session 2026, SB1234.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that in New Zealand, government industry agreements are a well-utilized tool for managing the government's response to biosecurity threats. Government industry agreements are established between the government and private entities within the agricultural sector to outline the division of roles and responsibilities if a biosecurity threat occurs.  For example, when a devastating kiwi fruit fungus was discovered in New Zealand, the New Zealand government entered into a government industry agreement with the fruit industry that outlined how future biosecurity threats to kiwi fruit would be handled, including the financial contributions that private entities would make toward the response efforts.  Since that initial agreement in 2014, additional government industry agreements have also been signed in New Zealand relating to pork, apples, pears, and many other industries. The legislature believes that Hawaii would benefit significantly from creating a similar process for establishing government industry agreements.  These agreements would allow the State to plan for potential biosecurity threats and to enter into partnerships with private entities to meet the State's statutory goals and mandates, including food sustainability and food production goals. The ability to enter into agreements like New Zealand's government industry agreements would allow the State to work collaboratively with private industries to ensure that all parties' interests are advanced. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to authorize certain state departments and agencies to enter into intergovernmental agreements and partnerships. SECTION 2.  Chapter 26, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part II to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§26- Intergovernmental agreements and partnerships.  (a) A department or agency established under this chapter may enter into: (1)  Intergovernmental agreements with other governmental bodies; or (2)  Partnership agreements with private-sector entities, including nonprofit organizations, to achieve statutorily mandated goals. (b)  Each intergovernmental or partnership agreement shall: (1)  Be consistent with the statutory mandates of the department or agency; (2)  Promote public benefits and align with state policy goals; (3)  Ensure transparency, accountability, and compliance with chapter 103D; and (4)  Be reviewed and approved as to form and legality by the attorney general. (c)  Each department or agency shall submit to the legislature a report on the intergovernmental and partnership agreements entered into by the department or agency no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session.  The report shall detail the scope, purpose, and outcome of each intergovernmental and partnership agreement entered into by the department or agency." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on May 13, 2040.